Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 14 Hay and Straw

47-14-1.
Weighing and marking of bundles.

Before any hay or straw pressed into bundles shall be delivered to any purchaser within the state, the bundles shall be weighed by some town weigher, and the tare for wood and other bindings about the bundles, as nearly as they can be ascertained without unbinding the same, shall be deducted therefrom, and the gross weight of the bundle with the tare ascertained as aforesaid, and the weight of the hay or straw therein shall, in legible figures with the initials of the weigher, be marked upon some board or wood attached to each bundle of hay or straw.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 153, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 179, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 209, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 413, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

47-14-1

.

47-14-2.
Concealment of wet, damaged, or inferior hay or straw.

Every person who shall put into or conceal in any bundle of hay or straw any wet or damaged hay or other material or hay of an inferior quality to that which plainly appears upon the outside of the bundle, or who knowingly offers for sale or sells any bundle as merchantable in which there is concealed any wet, damaged, or inferior hay or other materials shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 153, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 179, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 209, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 413, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

47-14-2

.

47-14-3.
Penalty for violations — Sale for consumption or by weight.

Every person violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00) and forfeit one hundred dollars ($100), one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the town and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the person who shall sue for the same. But nothing herein contained shall be so construed as to apply to the sale of hay and straw sold by the producer thereof for consumption and not to be resold, nor to prevent the purchase of commodities by a standard weight expressly agreed on by the parties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 153, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 179, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 209, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 413, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

47-14-3

.